Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.82.060

License fees or taxes on telephone business—Imposition on certain gross revenues authorized—Limitations.

(1) Any code city which imposes a license fee or tax upon the business activity of engaging in the telephone business which is measured by gross receipts or gross income may impose the fee or tax, if it desires, on one hundred percent of the total gross revenue derived from intrastate toll telephone services subject to the fee or tax: PROVIDED, That the city shall not impose the fee or tax on that portion of network telephone service which represents charges to another telecommunications company, as defined in RCW 80.04.010, for connecting fees, switching charges, or carrier access charges relating to intrastate toll telephone services, or for access to, or charges for, interstate services, or charges for network telephone service that is purchased for the purpose of resale, or charges for mobile telecommunications services provided to customers whose place of primary use is not within the city.

(2) Any city that imposes a license tax or fee under subsection (1) of this section has the authority, rights, and obligations of a taxing jurisdiction as provided in RCW 82.32.490 through 82.32.510.

(3) The definitions in RCW 82.04.065 and 82.16.010 apply to this section.

[ 2007 c 6 s 1014; 2007 c 6 s 1013; 2002 c 67 s 10; 1989 c 103 s 3; 1986 c 70 s 4; 1983 2nd ex.s. c 3 s 38; 1981 c 144 s 11.]

NOTES:

Contingent effective date—2007 c 6 ss 1003, 1006, 1014, and 1018: See note following RCW 82.04.065.

Part headings not law—Savings—Effective date—Severability—2007 c 6: See notes following RCW 82.32.020.

Findings—Intent—2007 c 6: See note following RCW 82.14.390.

Finding—Effective date—2002 c 67: See notes following RCW 82.04.530.

Severability—1989 c 103: See note following RCW 35.21.714.

Effective date—1986 c 70 ss 1, 2, 4, 5: See note following RCW 35.21.714.

Construction—Severability—Effective dates—1983 2nd ex.s. c 3: See notes following RCW 82.04.255.

Intent—Severability—Effective date—1981 c 144: See notes following RCW 82.16.010.